src/morphology/stems/fin-acronyms.lexc
LEXICON ACRO_TUOTE

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_UU

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_VIISI

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_VUOSI

:  ACRO_KUUSI  ;


LEXICON ACRO_WEBER

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_YHDEKSÄN

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_YHDISTYS

:  ACRO_VIISI  ;


LEXICON ACRO_YKSI

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_YY

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_ZET

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_ÄKS

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_ÄÄ

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_ÖÖ

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;

LEXICON ACRONYM
A1+ACR:A1  ACRO_YKSI  ;
A5+ACR:A5  ACRO_VIISI  ;
aHz+ACR:aHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
ALS+ACR:ALS  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
aS+ACR:aS  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
as.oy+ACR:as.oy  ACRO_YY  ;
AU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:AU  ACRO_UU  ;
ay+ACR:ay  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
ay+ACR:ay  ACRO_YY  ;
B9+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:B9  ACRO_YHDEKSÄN  ;
BATS+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:BATS  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
B&B+ACR:B&B  ACRO_WEBER  ;
BBC+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:BBC  ACRO_WEBER  ;
BDS$+ACR:BDS$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
Ber$+ACR:Ber$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
bkt+ACR:bkt  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
BKT+ACR:BKT  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
Blue1+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Blue1  ACRO_YKSI  ;
Bq+ACR:Bq  ACRO_UU  ;
Bq+ACR:Bq  ACRO_WEBER  ;
BRZ+ACR:BRZ  ACRO_ZET  ;
BTN+ACR:BTN  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
BZ$+ACR:BZ$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
cBq+ACR:cBq  ACRO_UU  ;
cF+ACR:cF  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
cGy+ACR:cGy  ACRO_YY  ;
Ch$+ACR:Ch$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
cHz+ACR:cHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
CNN+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:CNN  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
CNY+ACR:CNY  ACRO_YY  ;
COU+ACR:COU  ACRO_UU  ;
csr+ACR:csr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
Cu+ACR:Cu  ACRO_UU  ;
cWb+ACR:cWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
CZ+ACR:CZ  ACRO_ZET  ;
daBq+ACR:daBq  ACRO_UU  ;
daGy+ACR:daGy  ACRO_YY  ;
daHz+ACR:daHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
damol+ACR:damol  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
daWb+ACR:daWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
dBq+ACR:dBq  ACRO_UU  ;
den+ACR:den  ACRO_WEBER  ;
dGy+ACR:dGy  ACRO_YY  ;
dHz+ACR:dHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
DKr+ACR:DKr  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
dsr+ACR:dsr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
DU+ACR:DU  ACRO_UU  ;
dWb+ACR:dWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
EADS+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:EADS  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
EAY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:EAY  ACRO_YY  ;
EBq+ACR:EBq  ACRO_UU  ;
EBU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:EBU  ACRO_UU  ;
EC$+ACR:EC$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
ECU+ACR:ECU  ACRO_UU  ;
EGy+ACR:EGy  ACRO_YY  ;
EHTY+ACR:EHTY  ACRO_YY  ;
Ehty+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Ehty  ACRO_YY  ;
EHz+ACR:EHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
Elm+ACR:Elm  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
EMU+ACR+Prop:EMU  ACRO_UU  ;
Emu+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Emu  ACRO_UU  ;
EMU+N:EMU  ACRO_UU  ;    !!= * {{@CODE@}} European Monetary Union
eQ+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:eQ  ACRO_UU  ;
EQ+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:EQ  ACRO_UU  ;
Esr+ACR:Esr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
ESTIEM+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:ESTIEM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
ESY+ACR:ESY  ACRO_YY  ;
ETY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:ETY  ACRO_YY  ;
EU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:EU  ACRO_UU  ;
EU+N:EU  ACRO_UU  ;      !!= * {{@CODE@}} Euroopan Unioni
EUSTORY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:EUSTORY  ACRO_YY  ;
EWb+ACR:EWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
EY+N:EY  ACRO_YY  ;      !!= * {{@CODE@}} Euroopan Yhteisö
FAQ+ACR:FAQ  ACRO_UU  ;
fBq+ACR:fBq  ACRO_UU  ;
Fbu+ACR:Fbu  ACRO_UU  ;
FEPCO% 1+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:FEPCO% 1   ACRO_YKSI  ;
fHz+ACR:fHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
FIN+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Geo:FIN  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
fS+ACR:fS  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
fsr+ACR:fsr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
FTP+ACR:FTP  ACRO_WEBER  ;
G$+ACR:G$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
GBq+ACR:GBq  ACRO_UU  ;
GCHQ+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:GCHQ  ACRO_UU  ;
GGy+ACR:GGy  ACRO_YY  ;
GHz+ACR:GHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
Gmol+ACR:Gmol  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
GTQ+ACR:GTQ  ACRO_UU  ;
GWb+ACR:GWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
HCL+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:HCL  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
Helsingin% NMKY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Helsingin% NMKY ACRO_YY  ;
HFU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:HFU  ACRO_UU  ;
hGy+ACR:hGy  ACRO_YY  ;
hHz+ACR:hHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
HIV+ACR:HIV  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
HKL+ACR:HKL  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
HN+ACR:HN  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
HSL+ACR:HSL  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
hsr+ACR:hsr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
HUF+ACR:HUF  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
HYY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:HYY  ACRO_YY  ;
Hz+ACR:Hz  ACRO_ZET  ;
i+ACR:i  ACRO_WEBER  ;
IAU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:IAU  ACRO_UU  ;
INR+ACR:INR  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
ISY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:ISY  ACRO_YY  ;
ITU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:ITU  ACRO_UU  ;
JoY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:JoY  ACRO_YY  ;
JSN+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:JSN  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
JY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:JY  ACRO_YY  ;
K15+ACR:K15  ACRO_VIISI  ;
K1+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:K1  ACRO_YKSI  ;
kBq+ACR:kBq  ACRO_UU  ;
kHz+ACR:kHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
kiint.oy+ACR:kiint.oy  ACRO_YY  ;
kk+ACR:kk  ACRO_VUOSI  ;
KM+ACR:KM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
KOY+ACR:KOY  ACRO_YY  ;
kpl+ACR:kpl  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
krs+ACR:krs  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
ksr+ACR:ksr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
KTM+ACR:KTM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
KTT+ACR:KTT  ACRO_WEBER  ;
Lappeenrannan% NMKY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Lappeenrannan% NMKY ACRO_YY  ;
LitT+ACR:LitT  ACRO_WEBER  ;
lm+ACR:lm  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
LOGY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:LOGY  ACRO_YY  ;
LUTU+ACR:LUTU  ACRO_UU  ;
ly+ACR:ly  ACRO_YY  ;
m³+ACR:m³  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
MAMU+ACR:MAMU  ACRO_UU  ;
MBq+ACR:MBq  ACRO_UU  ;
MEX$+ACR:MEX$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
mF+ACR:mF  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
mGy+ACR:mGy  ACRO_YY  ;
mHz+ACR:mHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
MHz+ACR:MHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
Mm+ACR:Mm  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
MQ+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:MQ  ACRO_UU  ;
Ms+ACR:Ms  ACRO_WEBER  ;
m/s+ACR:m/s  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
Msr+ACR:Msr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
Muutos% 2%011+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Muutos% 2011  ACRO_YKSI  ;
mWb+ACR:mWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
MYEL+ACR:MYEL  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
MYY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:MYY  ACRO_YY  ;
N$+ACR:N$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
nGy+ACR:nGy  ACRO_YY  ;
nHz+ACR:nHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
nlm+ACR:nlm  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
NMKY+ACR:NMKY  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
NNKY+ACR:NNKY  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
NNKY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:NNKY  ACRO_YY  ;
nsr+ACR:nsr  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
NT$+ACR:NT$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
Nu+ACR:Nu  ACRO_UU  ;
Nurmon% Urheilijat% -99+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Nurmon% Urheilijat% -99  ACRO_YHDEKSÄN  ;
NZ$+ACR:NZ$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
OTL+ACR:OTL  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
oy+ACR:oy  ACRO_YY  ;
OY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:OY  ACRO_YY  ;
OY+N:OY  ACRO_YY  ;    !!= * {{@CODE@}} Osake-Yhtiö
pBq+ACR:pBq  ACRO_UU  ;
pGy+ACR:pGy  ACRO_YY  ;
pHz+ACR:pHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
PHz+ACR:PHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
plm+ACR:plm  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
PLZ+ACR:PLZ  ACRO_ZET  ;
PPR+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:PPR  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
PRH+ACR:PRH  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
prk+ACR:prk  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
ProSiebenSat1+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:ProSiebenSat1  ACRO_YKSI  ;
psr+ACR:psr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
pvc+ACR:pvc  ACRO_WEBER  ;
PWb+ACR:PWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
q+ACR:q  ACRO_UU  ;
q+N:q  ACRO_UU  ;
QR+ACR:QR  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
RAY+ACR:RAY  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
RAY+ACR:RAY  ACRO_YY  ;
RD$+ACR:RD$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
RFSU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:RFSU  ACRO_UU  ;
RKP+ACR:RKP  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
r+N:r  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
RWF+ACR:RWF  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
SATU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:SATU  ACRO_UU  ;
Sdp+ACR:Sdp  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
SDP+ACR:SDP  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
SEY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:SEY  ACRO_YY  ;
Sfr+ACR:Sfr  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
SI$+ACR:SI$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
Skp+ACR:Skp  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
SKP+ACR:SKP  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
SLU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:SLU  ACRO_UU  ;
SMP+ACR:SMP  ACRO_TUOTE  ;
s+N:s  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
sr+ACR:sr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
SRl+ACR:SRl  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
SRMY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:SRMY  ACRO_YY  ;
SVUL+N:SVUL  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
TASKU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:TASKU  ACRO_UU  ;
TaY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:TaY  ACRO_YY  ;
TeK+ACR:TeK  ACRO_WEBER  ;
TeM+ACR:TeM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
TES+ACR:TES  ACRO_YHDISTYS  ;
TeT+ACR:TeT  ACRO_WEBER  ;
TGK-5+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:TGK-5  ACRO_VIISI  ;
THz+ACR:THz  ACRO_ZET  ;
TM+ACR+Prop:TM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
TRY+ACR:TRY  ACRO_YY  ;
TT$+ACR:TT$  ACRO_WEBER  ;
TTL+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:TTL  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
TU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:TU  ACRO_UU  ;
Turun% NMKY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Turun% NMKY ACRO_YY  ;
TV1+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:TV1  ACRO_YKSI  ;
TWb+ACR:TWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
ty+ACR:ty  ACRO_YY  ;
U+ACR:U  ACRO_UU  ;
UAZ+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:UAZ  ACRO_ZET  ;
UM+ACR:UM  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
U+N:U  ACRO_UU  ;
UPU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:UPU  ACRO_UU  ;
uä+ACR:uä  ACRO_ÄÄ  ;
v+ACR:v  ACRO_VUOSI  ;
VEF+ACR:VEF  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
VPS+N:VPS  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
vrk+ACR:vrk  ACRO_VUOSI  ;
VTY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:VTY  ACRO_YY  ;
Wb+ACR:Wb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
WELMU+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:WELMU  ACRO_UU  ;
Windows% 95+ACR:Windows% 95 ACRO_VIISI  ;
Windows% 95+N:Windows% 95   ACRO_VIISI  ;
WSOY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:WSOY  ACRO_YY  ;
XAU+ACR:XAU  ACRO_UU  ;
XFU+ACR:XFU  ACRO_UU  ;
XL+ACR:XL  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
y+ACR:y  ACRO_YY  ;
YBq+ACR:YBq  ACRO_UU  ;
yGy+ACR:yGy  ACRO_YY  ;
Yhdistys% 9+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Yhdistys% 9 ACRO_YHDEKSÄN  ;
yHz+ACR:yHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
YHz+ACR:YHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
y+N:y  ACRO_YY  ;
Ysr+ACR:Ysr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
ysr+ACR:ysr  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
YWb+ACR:YWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
z+ACR:z  ACRO_ZET  ;
Z+ACR:Z  ACRO_ZET  ;
ZBq+ACR:ZBq  ACRO_UU  ;
zGy+ACR:zGy  ACRO_YY  ;
zHz+ACR:zHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
ZHz+ACR:ZHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
z+N:z  ACRO_ZET  ;
Z+N:Z  ACRO_ZET  ;
ž+N:ž  ACRO_ZET  ;
Ž+N:Ž  ACRO_ZET  ;
ZRZ+ACR:ZRZ  ACRO_ZET  ;
zsr+ACR:zsr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
Zsr+ACR:Zsr  ACRO_ÄKS  ;
zWb+ACR:zWb  ACRO_WEBER  ;
å+ACR:å  ACRO_WEBER  ;
ä+ACR:ä  ACRO_ÄÄ  ;
Ä+ACR:Ä  ACRO_ÄÄ  ;
ä+N:ä  ACRO_ÄÄ  ;
Ä+N:Ä  ACRO_ÄÄ  ;
Ö+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Human:Ö  ACRO_ÖÖ  ;
ö+ACR:ö  ACRO_ÖÖ  ;
ö+N:ö  ACRO_ÖÖ  ;
Ö+N:Ö  ACRO_ÖÖ  ;
μGy+ACR:μGy  ACRO_YY  ;
μHz+ACR:μHz  ACRO_ZET  ;
μsr+ACR:μsr  ACRO_WEBER  ;
